Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.350

Application—Use of records or exchange of information not affected.

This chapter does not affect the use of records, obtained from the secretary or the disciplining authorities, in any existing investigation or action by any state agency. Nor does this chapter limit any existing exchange of information between the secretary or the disciplining authorities and other state agencies.

[ 1997 c 270 s 3.]